South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4694.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) There is created a study committee to review the effects of Act 388 of 2006 on property assessed at six percent pursuant to Section 12-43-220(e) and all other classes of property, and the impact on school district funding and property taxpayers. (B) The committee is comprised of the following members: (1) one member of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate; (2) one member of the Senate appointed by the Chairman of the Senate Finance Committee; (3) one member of the Senate appointed by the Chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee; (4) one member of the Senate appointed by the Senate Majority Leader; (5) one member of the Senate appointed by the Senate Minority Leader; (6) one member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House; (7) one member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee; (8) one member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Chairman of the House Judiciary Committee; (9) one member of the House of Representatives appointed by the House Majority Leader; and (10) one member of the House of Representatives appointed by the House Minority Leader. (C) The study committee shall provide a report with findings and recommendations to the General Assembly before July 1, 2027, at which time the study committee is dissolved. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----